src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_to_verb.lexc
LEXICON  Z1_qaZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:^T%>ajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>erniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv@U.irsir.ON@:@U.irsir.ON@^T%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:^T%>kip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:^T%>kkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:^T%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>liar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_tv ; ! HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:^T%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@:@U.lirsur.ON@^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV@U.lirsur.ON@:@U.lirsur.ON@^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:^T%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>nngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:^T%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:^T%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:^T%>rpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:^T%>qar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv@U.sinv.ON@:@U.sinv.ON@%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu tu_iv ; ! IV_voq_stem
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor tur_iv ; ! IV_r_stem
+U+Der/nv:^T%>u copula_nv ; ! IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@^T%>usaar IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON Z1_qoZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:^T%>iar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>erniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:^T%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:^T%>kip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:^T%>kkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:^T%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>liar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_tv ; ! HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:^T%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:^T%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>nngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:^T%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:^T%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:^T%>rpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:^T%>qar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:^T%>u copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@^T%>usaar IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON Z1_qeZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:^T%>iar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>erniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:^T%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:^T%>kip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:^T%>kkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:^T%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>liar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_tv ; ! HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:^T%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:^T%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>nngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:^T%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:^T%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:^T%>rpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:^T%>qar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:^T%>u copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@^T%>usaar IV_r_stem ;

LEXICON ZsaqZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:^T%>ajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>erniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:^T%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:^T%>kip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:^T%>kkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:^T%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>liar IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_tv ; ! HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:^T%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>liuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LIUTE+Der/nv:^T%>liup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LUP+Der/nv:%>lup IV_k_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:^T%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>nngor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR+Der/nv:^T%>nngorsar DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:^T%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:^T%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:^T%>rpalup IV_k ;
+QAR+Der/nv:^T%>qar IV_r_stem ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:^T%>u copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@^T%>usaar IV_r_stem ;


LEXICON Z1_kaZ_verbalizers
+GASAAR+Der/nv:%>gasaar IV_long_stem ;
+GE+Der/nv:%>g2 HTR_schwa_SAQ_nnip ;
+GE+Der/nv+GALUAQ+Der/vn:%>g2igaluaq GEGALUAQ ;
+GIP+Der/nv:%>g2ip XIiXmorf_stem ;
+GISSAAR+Der/nv:%>g2issaar IV_r_stem ;
+GIIP@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>g2iip@U.Num.Pl@ XIiXmorf_stem ;
+IAR+Der/nv:^T%>ajar HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+IRNIAR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>erniar IV_r ; ! +IR+Der/nv+NIAR+Der/vv
+IRSIR+Der/nv:^T%>erser XIirXmorf_stem ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup XIuteXmorf ;
+IRUTE+Der/nv:^T%>erup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+KIP+Der/nv:^T%>kip XItsXmorf_stem ;
+KKAAR@U.ObjNum.Pl@+Der/nv:^T%>kkaar@U.ObjNum.Pl@ HTR_longV_GAQ_addi ;
+KKUMINAR+Der/nv:^T%>kkuminar IV_r_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_iv ; !XIirXmorf_stem
+LIR+Der/nv:^T%>ler lir_tv ; ! HTR_ir_GAQ_i
+LIR+Der/nv:^VCT%>ker IV_r_stem ;
+LIR+Der/nv:^VCT%>ker HTR_r_GAQ_i ; !nammakkerpaa
+LIRNGUSAATE@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv+Gram/Reci:^T%>lerngusaap@U.Num.Pl@ XIuteXmorf ;
+LIRI+Der/nv:^T%>leri XIi_voqXmorf ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>lersor IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^T%>lersor TV_UTE_gennemgang ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^VCT%>kersor IV_r_stem ;
+LIRSUR+Der/nv@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@:@U.lirsur.ON@@U.vip.OFF@^VCT%>kersor HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisaar IV_r_stem ;
+LISAAR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@^T%>lisaarup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+LISAR+Der/nv:^T%>lisar IV_r_stem ;
+LIUR+Der/nv:^T%>lior IV_r_stem ;
+NIP+Der/nv:^T%>nip IV_k ;
+NNGIR+Der/nv:^T%>nnger XIirXmorf_stem ; !livm 20171023
+NNGUR@C.Num@+Der/nv+Gram/IV:^T%>nngor@C.Num@ IV_r_UTE_gennemgang ; !PL 20180201 Nyt gennemgangskatalog
+NNGUR@C.Num@+Der/nv:^T%>nngor@C.Num@ HTR_r_GAQ_i ;
+NNGUR@C.Num@+Der/nv:^T%>nngorsar@C.Num@ DOTR_IV_r ;
+PALAAR+Der/nv:^T%>rpalaar IV_r_stem ;
+PALLAP+Der/nv:^T%>rpallap IV_k ;
+PALUP+Der/nv:^T%>rpalup IV_k ;
+QAR@C.Num@+Der/nv:^T%>qar@C.Num@ IV_r ;
+SI+Der/nv:%>si XIi_voqXmorf ;
+SIUR+Der/nv:%>sior IV_r_stem ;
+SIUR+Der/nv+UTE+Der/vv@U.saar.OFF@:@U.saar.OFF@%>siuup HTR_UTE_SSAQ_ssi ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip IV_k ;
+SUNNIP+Der/nv:%>sunnip XItsX ;
+SSAQQIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssaqqip XIiXmorf_stem ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip HTR_iC_TAQ_i ;
!+SSIP+Der/nv:^T%>ssip IV_k ;
+TAAR+Der/nv:%>taar IV_r_stem ;
+TU+Der/nv:%>tu IV_voq_stem ;
+TUR+Der/nv:%>tor IV_r_stem ;
+U+Der/nv:^T%>a copula_nv ; !IV_voq
+USAAR+Der/nv@U.usaar.ON@:@U.usaar.ON@^T%>usaar IV_r_stem ;
